Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3507
Homesteads; assessment; exemptions; qualified claimants; based on income.

(1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt from taxation on homesteads of qualified claimants a percentage of the exempt amount as limited by section 77-3506.03. The percentage of the exempt amount shall be determined based on the household income of a claimant pursuant to subsections (2) through (4) of this section.

(2) For 2014, for a qualified married or closely related claimant, the percentage of the exempt amount for which the claimant shall be eligible shall be the percentage in Column B which corresponds with the claimant's household income in Column A in the table found in this subsection.

Column AColumn BHousehold IncomePercentageIn DollarsOf Relief0 through 31,60010031,601 through 33,3009033,301 through 35,0008035,001 through 36,7007036,701 through 38,4006038,401 through 40,1005040,101 through 41,8004041,801 through 43,5003043,501 through 45,2002045,201 through 46,9001046,901 and over0

(3) For 2014, for a qualified single claimant, the percentage of the exempt amount for which the claimant shall be eligible shall be the percentage in Column B which corresponds with the claimant's household income in Column A in the table found in this subsection.

Column AColumn BHousehold IncomePercentageIn DollarsOf Relief0 through 26,90010026,901 through 28,3009028,301 through 29,7008029,701 through 31,1007031,101 through 32,5006032,501 through 33,9005033,901 through 35,3004035,301 through 36,7003036,701 through 38,1002038,101 through 39,5001039,501 and over0

(4) For exemption applications filed in calendar years 2015 through 2017, the income eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be adjusted by the percentage determined pursuant to the provisions of section 1(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed prior to December 22, 2017. For exemption applications filed in calendar year 2018 and each calendar year thereafter, the income eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be adjusted by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics from the twelve months ending on August 31, 2016, to the twelve months ending on August 31 of the year preceding the applicable calendar year. The income eligibility amounts shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation since 2014. If any amount is not a multiple of one hundred dollars, the amount shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one hundred dollars.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 7;

Laws 1980, LB 647, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 179, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 956, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1105, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 33;

Laws 1995, LB 483, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 182, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 179, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB986, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1089, § 9.
April 18, 2018